District of Columbia statutes.
3-704

Administration.

(a)

The Commission shall appoint an Executive Director who shall be the chief administrative officer of the Commission. The Executive Director shall report regularly to the Commission on staff activities. The Executive Director shall receive annual rate of compensation fixed in accordance with Chapter 51 of Title 5 of the United States Code.

(b)

Additional staff service for the Commission shall be supplied in accordance with positions and funding approved in the District of Columbia budget.

(c)

The Commission is authorized to establish rules and procedures for the conduct of its business, including the election of officers other than the Chairperson, as it deems necessary.

(d)

The Commission shall submit to the Mayor annual reports of its activities and the work carried on under its direction.

History

Sept. 22, 1978, D.C. Law 2-109, § 5, 25 DCR 1456

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-804.
1973 Ed., § 2-2604.